Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2114.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7518. Adhesive pest control devices.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits a summary offense if the person uses, places or distributes an adhesive pest control device.(b) Exceptions.--The prohibition under subsection (a) shall not apply to:(1) Individuals certified as applicators under section 16.1, 17 or 17.1 of the act of March 1, 1974 (P.L.90, No.24), known as the Pennsylvania Pesticide Control Act of 1973.(2) Research institutions or governmental agencies using an adhesive pest control device for scientific or public health purposes under controlled conditions.12345678910111213141516171819 (c) Penalties.--A person who violates this section shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of no more than $25.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "adhesive pest control device" means any device designed to capture or immobilize animals using a sticky or glue-based surface.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2114PN2735 - 2 - 123456